Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
C. Judicial Appraisal of Shares

§ 17-16-1330.
Court action.

If a shareholder makes a demand for payment under W.S.

17-16-1326

which remains unsettled, the corporation shall commence a proceeding within sixty (60) days after receiving the payment demand and petition the court to determine the fair value of the shares and accrued interest. If the corporation does not commence the proceeding within the sixty (60) day period, it shall pay each shareholder demanding appraisal rights whose demand remains unsettled the amount demanded pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1326

plus interest.

The corporation shall commence the proceeding in the district court of the county where a corporation’s principal office, or if none in this state, its registered office, is located. If the corporation is a foreign corporation without a registered office in this state, it shall commence the proceeding in the county in this state where the principal office or registered office of the domestic corporation merged with or whose shares were acquired by the foreign corporation was located at the time of the transaction.

The corporation shall make all shareholders, whether or not residents of this state, whose demands remain unsettled parties to the proceeding as in an action against their shares and all parties shall be served with a copy of the petition. Nonresidents may be served by registered or certified mail or by publication as provided by law.

The jurisdiction of the court in which the proceeding is commenced under subsection (b) of this section is plenary and exclusive. The court may appoint one (1) or more persons as appraisers to receive evidence and recommend decision on the question of fair value. The appraisers have the powers described in the order appointing them, or in the amendment to it. The shareholders demanding appraisal rights are entitled to the same discovery rights as parties in other civil proceedings.

Each shareholder made a party to the proceeding is entitled to judgment for:

The amount, if any, by which the court finds the fair value of his shares, plus interest, exceeds the amount paid by the corporation to the shareholder for those shares; or

The fair value, plus accrued interest, of his after-acquired shares for which the corporation elected to withhold payment under W.S.

17-16-1325

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to service by publication, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

As to depositions and discovery, see Rules 26 to 37, W.R.C.P.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “shareholder” for “dissenter” throughout the section; in (a), added “shareholder makes a” and “which” in the first sentence, and inserted “demanding appraisal rights” and “pursuant to W.S. 17-16-1328 plus interest” in the last sentence; added “principal office or” and “at the time of the transaction” in the last sentence of (b); inserted “demanding appraisal rights” in the last sentence of (d): and inserted “to the shareholder for those shares” in (e)(i).

Fair value. —

In determining the value of fractional shares of stock, a district court erred when it applied a 30 percent minority discount because the value of the shares should not have been adversely impacted by the mere fact of being a minority shareholder. A discount for trapped-in capital gains was also inappropriate because it was premised on an action contemplated by a corporation subsequent to a reverse stock split, and there was a lack of an evidentiary basis to calculate the discount when the nature, timing, and details were speculative; moreover, it was error to omit corporate assets from the calculation of fair value.
Brown v. Arp & Hammond Hardware Co., 2006 WY 107, 141 P.3d 673,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2006).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Causation in private civil actions by minority shareholders under proxy provisions of § 14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USCS § 78n(a)) and Securities Exchange Act (SEC) Rules thereunder — post Virginia Bankshares, 137 ALR Fed 293.

§ 17-16-1331.
Court costs and counsel fees.

The court in an appraisal proceeding commenced under W.S.

17-16-1330

shall determine all costs of the proceeding, including the reasonable compensation and expenses of appraisers appointed by the court. The court shall assess the costs against the corporation, except that the court may assess costs against all or some of the shareholders demanding appraisal, in amounts the court finds equitable, to the extent the court finds the shareholders demanding appraisal rights acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith with respect to the rights provided by this article.

The court in an appraisal proceeding may also assess the fees and expenses of counsel and experts for the respective parties, in amounts the court finds equitable:

Against the corporation and in favor of any or all shareholders demanding appraisal if the court finds the corporation did not substantially comply with the requirements of W.S.

17-16-1320

through

17-16-1326

; or

Against either the corporation or a shareholder demanding appraisal, in favor of any other party, if the court finds that the party against whom the fees and expenses are assessed acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith with respect to the rights provided by this article.

If the court in an appraisal proceeding finds that the services of counsel and any other expenses incurred for any shareholder demanding appraisal were of substantial benefit to other shareholders similarly situated, and that the fees for those services and other expenses should not be assessed against the corporation, the court may direct that those fees and expenses be paid out of the amounts awarded the shareholders who were benefited.

To the extent the corporation fails to make a required payment pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1324

,

17-16-1325

or

17-16-1326

, the shareholder may sue directly for the amount owed, and to the extent successful, shall be entitled to recover from the corporation all expenses of the suit.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “shareholders demanding appraisal” or variant for “dissenters” or variant throughout section; substituted “with respect to the rights provided by this article” for “in demanding payment under W.S. 17-16-1328” in (a); added “in an appraisal proceeding” in the introductory language of (b), and in (c); in (c), added “and any other expenses incurred,” substituted “shareholders” for “dissenters” wherever it appears; added “and other expenses,” and substituted “direct that those fees and expenses” for “award to these counsel reasonable fees to”; and added (d).

§ 17-16-1340.
Other remedies limited.

The legality of a proposed or completed corporate action described in W.S. 17-16-1302(a) may not be contested, nor may the corporate action be enjoined, set aside or rescinded, in a legal or equitable proceeding by a shareholder after the shareholders have approved the corporate action.

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to a corporate action that:

Was not authorized and approved in accordance with the applicable provisions of:

Article 9, 10, 11 or 12 of this act;

The articles of incorporation or bylaws; or

The resolution of the board of directors authorizing the corporate action.

Was procured as a result of fraud, a material misrepresentation or an omission of a material fact necessary to make statements made, in light of the circumstances in which they were made, not misleading;

Reserved;

Is approved by less than unanimous consent of the voting shareholders pursuant to W.S.

17-16-704

if:

The challenge to the corporate action is brought by a shareholder who did not consent and as to whom notice of the approval of the corporate action was not effective at least ten (10) days before the corporate action was effected; and

The proceeding challenging the corporate action is commenced within ten (10) days after notice of the approval of the corporate action is effective as to the shareholder bringing the proceeding.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.